North Carolina, session 2025, SB177.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES

MEDICAID REBASE AND MANAGED CARE ADMINISTRATION
SECTION 1.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, the sum of five hundred million dollars
($500,000,000) in recurring funds and associated receipts for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium. These funds shall be used to adjust Medicaid funding to account for projected changes
in enrollment, enrollment mix, service and capitation costs, and federal match rates, as well as
the implementation of the Children and Families Specialty Plan in December 2025 or for
contracts needed to operate the State's Medicaid managed care program.

PART II. GENERAL GOVERNMENT

AUDITOR POSITIONS
SECTION 2.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of the
State Auditor the sum of two million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($2,250,000) in recurring
funds for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for up to 25 additional positions,
including salaries, benefits, and operating costs.

SBE EXEMPT POSITIONS/FUNDS
SECTION 2.2.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the State Board
of Elections the sum of one million one hundred ninety-three thousand nine hundred seventy-nine
dollars ($1,193,979) in recurring funds for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to
provide funds for the following seven new exempt positions, including salaries, benefits, and
operating costs:
(1) Administrative Officer III.
(2) Agency General Counsel II.
(3) Agency HR Director II.
(4) Assistant General Counsel II.
(5) Internal Auditor.
*S177-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6) Legislative Affairs Manager.
(7) Public Information Manager.
SECTION 2.2.(b) G.S. 126-5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 126-5. Employees subject to Chapter; exemptions.
…
(c14) Notwithstanding any provision of this Chapter to the contrary, each Council of State
agency and agency, the Office of the State Controller Controller, and the Executive Director of
the State Board of Elections has the sole authority to set the salary of its exempt policymaking
and exempt managerial positions within the minimum rates, and the maximum rates plus ten
percent (10%), established by the State Human Resources Commission under G.S. 126-4(2).
…
(d)(1) Exempt Positions in Cabinet Department. – Subject to this Chapter, which is
known as the North Carolina Human Resources Act, the Governor may designate a total of 425
exempt positions throughout the following departments and offices:
…
(2) Exempt Positions in Council of State Departments and Offices and Offices,
the Office of the State Controller. Controller, and the State Board of Elections.
– The Secretary of State, the Auditor, the Treasurer, the Attorney General, the
Superintendent of Public Instruction, the Commissioner of Agriculture, the
Commissioner of Insurance, the Labor Commissioner, and the State
Controller Controller, and the Executive Director of the State Board of
Elections may designate exempt positions. The number of exempt
policymaking positions in each department headed by an elected department
head listed in this subdivision is limited to 25 exempt policymaking positions
or two percent (2%) of the total number of full-time positions in the
department, whichever is greater. The number of exempt managerial positions
is limited to 25 positions or two percent (2%) of the total number of full-time
positions in the department, whichever is greater. The number of exempt
policymaking positions designated by the Superintendent of Public Instruction
is limited to 70 exempt policymaking positions or two percent (2%) of the
total number of full-time positions in the department, whichever is greater.
The number of exempt managerial positions designated by the Superintendent
of Public Instruction is limited to 70 exempt managerial positions or two
percent (2%) of the total number of full-time positions in the department,
whichever is greater. The total number of exempt positions, policymaking and
managerial, designated by the Office of the State Controller is limited to 10.
The total number of exempt positions designated by the Executive Director of
the State Board of Elections is limited to the following seven positions:
Agency Human Relations Director II, Agency General Counsel II, Assistant
General Counsel II, Public Information Manager, Legislative Affairs
Manager, Internal Auditor, and Administrative Officer III.
…
(4) Vacancies. – In the event of a vacancy in the Office of Governor, the office of
a member of the Council of State, or the Office of the State Controller,
Controller, or the Executive Director of the State Board of Elections, the
person who succeeds to or is appointed or elected to fill the unexpired term
shall make designations in a letter to the Director of the Office of State Human
Resources, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the President of
the Senate within 180 days after the oath of office is administered to that
person.
…."
Page 2 Senate Bill 177-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

SBE LITIGATION FUNDS
SECTION 2.3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the State Board of
Elections the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year for future litigation needs. These funds shall not revert on
June 30, 2026, but shall remain available until expended.

SBE SOFTWARE MODERNIZATION AND DIT PROCUREMENT EXEMPTION
SECTION 2.4.(a) There is appropriated from the Information Technology Reserve
in the General Fund, as established in Section 2.2(h) of S.L. 2021-180, to the State Board of
Elections the sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to complete the State Election Information Management System
(SEIMS) upgrade and the campaign finance software upgrade.
SECTION 2.4.(b) G.S. 143B-1320(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Exemptions. – Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, the provisions of
this Chapter do this Article does not apply to the following entities: the General Assembly, the
Judicial Department, and The University of North Carolina and its constituent institutions.
institutions, and the State Board of Elections. These entities may elect to participate in the
information technology programs, services, or contracts offered by the Department, including
information technology procurement, in accordance with the statutes, policies, and rules of the
Department. The election must be made in writing, as follows:
(1) For the General Assembly, by the Legislative Services Commission.
(2) For the Judicial Department, by the Chief Justice.
(3) For The University of North Carolina, by the Board of Governors.
(4) For the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina, by the
respective boards of trustees.
(5) For the State Board of Elections, by the Executive Director of the State Board
of Elections."

SBE MOVE TO ALBEMARLE BUILDING/FUNDS
SECTION 2.5.(a) The Department of Administration shall assign the sixth and
seventh floors of the Albemarle Building located in Raleigh, North Carolina, to the State Board
of Elections. The State Board of Elections shall complete its move to the Albemarle Building not
later than October 31, 2025. All State-owned equipment, furnishings, and other fixtures on the
sixth and seventh floors of the Albemarle Building on the date this section becomes effective
shall remain on those floors for use by the State Board of Elections. Nothing in this section shall
be construed as prohibiting the disposal, removal, or replacement of the equipment, furnishings,
and other fixtures described in this section after the State Board of Elections has moved into the
space described in this section.
SECTION 2.5.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the State Board
of Elections the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026
fiscal year to be used to relocate to the Albemarle Building as provided in subsection (a) of this
section.

PART III. STATEWIDE

CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT & REPAIRS AND RENOVATION PROJECT CASH
FLOW
SECTION 3.1.(a) There is appropriated from the State Capital and Infrastructure
Fund to the Office of State Budget and Management the sum of seven hundred thirteen million
seven hundred twenty thousand eight hundred eleven dollars ($713,720,811) in nonrecurring
Senate Bill 177-Third Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated to the following project codes in the following
amounts:
(1) DACS21-2 $1,500,000
(2) DACS21-4 1,500,000
(3) DEQ21-1 17,075,000
(4) DNCR21-13 86,800,000
(5) DNCR23-7 7,000,000
(6) DOA23-2 800,000
(7) NCGA21-3 65,250,000
(8) NCGA23-1 26,000,000
(9) UNC/BOG21-1 3,750,000
(10) DOI21-1 22,000,000
(11) DPS21-9 19,793,242
(12) DPS21-6 2,658,750
(13) DPS23-9 2,024,414
(14) DPS23-11 5,927,250
(15) NG23-1 6,000,000
(16) NG23-2 5,750,000
(17) NG23-3 2,250,000
(18) TRAN23-1 60,000,000
(19) UNC/ASU21-1 12,500,000
(20) UNC/ASU22-1 12,300,000
(21) UNC/ECS21-4 9,172,727
(22) UNC/ECS23-1 17,172,727
(23) UNC/ECU21-1 60,000,000
(24) UNC/FSU21-2 6,573,912
(25) UNC/NCS20-1 22,224,823
(26) UNC/NCS23-1 27,000,000
(27) UNC/NCS23-2 24,000,000
(28) UNC/SSM23-2 3,000,000
(29) UNC/CH20-2 17,693,052
(30) UNC/PEM21-1 30,500,000
(31) UNC/SA23-1 22,950,000
(32) UNC/WSS21-1 22,400,000
(33) PERS21 154,914
(34) R&R21 40,000,000
(35) UNC/R&R21 50,000,000
SECTION 3.1.(b) The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall
prioritize funds allocated for project code UNC/R&R21 for repairs and renovations pursuant to
G.S. 143C-8-13 and, notwithstanding G.S. 143C-8-13(a), for projects listed in Section 40.1(d) of
S.L. 2021-180. The cost for any single repair and renovation project other than those specifically
listed in Section 40.1(d) of S.L. 2021-180 shall not exceed fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000).
The Board of Governors may reallocate funds in accordance with G.S. 143C-8-13(b) or to
projects listed in Section 40.1(d) of S.L. 2021-180; provided, however, reallocation of funds
intended for a project located at a particular constituent institution may only be reallocated for
repairs and renovations projects at that particular constituent institution. The provisions of
G.S. 143C-8-13(b)(4) shall not apply to the projects listed in Section 40.1(d) of S.L. 2021-180.
The Board of Governors shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental
Operations in accordance with G.S. 143C-8-13(b).
Page 4 Senate Bill 177-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.1.(c) For project code R&R21, the provisions of Section 40.1(c) of S.L.
2021-180 shall apply to funds allocated for the project code during the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium.
SECTION 3.1.(d) There is appropriated from the State Capital and Infrastructure
Fund to the Office of State Budget and Management the sum of one million six hundred forty
thousand dollars ($1,640,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated
to the North Carolina School of Science and Math for temporary housing. This project shall be
known as project code UNC/SSM25-1 and shall have a maximum project authorization of two
million one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($2,180,000).

SALARY-RELATED CONTRIBUTIONS
SECTION 3.2.(a) Effective for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, required employer
salary-related contributions for employees whose salaries are paid from department, office,
institution, or agency receipts shall be paid from the same source as the source of the employee's
salary. If an employee's salary is paid in part from the General Fund or Highway Fund and in
part from department, office, institution, or agency receipts, required employer salary-related
contributions may be paid from the General Fund or Highway Fund only to the extent of the
proportionate part paid from the General Fund or Highway Fund in support of the salary of the
employee, and the remainder of the employer's requirements shall be paid from the source that
supplies the remainder of the employee's salary. The requirements of this section as to source of
payment are also applicable to payments on behalf of the employee for hospital medical benefits,
longevity pay, unemployment compensation, accumulated leave, workers' compensation,
severance pay, separation allowances, and applicable disability income benefits.
SECTION 3.2.(b) Effective July 1, 2025, the State's employer contribution rates
budgeted for retirement, health, and related benefits as a percentage of covered salaries for the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium for teachers and State employees, State law enforcement officers
(LEOs), the University and Community Colleges Optional Retirement Programs (ORPs), the
Consolidated Judicial Retirement System (CJRS), and the Legislative Retirement System (LRS)
are as set forth below:
Teachers State ORPs CJRS LRS
and State LEOs
Employees
Retirement 17.14% 17.14% 6.84% 37.73% 18.26%
Health 7.33% 7.33% 7.33% 7.33% 7.33%
Disability 0.07% 0.07% 0.07% 0.00% 0.00%
Death 0.13% 0.13% 0.00% 0.00% 0.00%
NC 401(k) 0.00% 5.00% 0.00% 0.00% 0.00%

Total Contribution
Rate 24.67% 29.67% 14.24% 45.06% 25.59%
The rate for health includes two and four-tenths percent (2.40%) for the Public
Employee Health Benefit Fund and four and ninety-three hundredths percent (4.93%) for the
Retiree Health Benefit Fund.
SECTION 3.2.(b1) If House Bill 192, 2025 Regular Session, becomes law, then
subsection (b) of this section is repealed and, effective July 1, 2025, the State's employer
contribution rates budgeted for retirement, health, and related benefits as a percentage of covered
salaries for the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium for teachers and State employees, State law
enforcement officers (LEOs), the University and Community Colleges Optional Retirement
Programs (ORPs), the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System (CJRS), and the Legislative
Retirement System (LRS) are as set forth below:
Teachers State ORPs CJRS LRS
Senate Bill 177-Third Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
and State LEOs
Employees
Retirement 17.44% 17.44% 6.84% 38.36% 18.90%
Health 7.33% 7.33% 7.33% 7.33% 7.33%
Disability 0.07% 0.07% 0.07% 0.00% 0.00%
Death 0.13% 0.13% 0.00% 0.00% 0.00%
NC 401(k) 0.00% 5.00% 0.00% 0.00% 0.00%

Total Contribution
Rate 24.97% 29.97% 14.24% 45.69% 26.23%
The rate for health includes two and four-tenths percent (2.40%) for the Public
Employee Health Benefit Fund and four and ninety-three hundredths percent (4.93%) for the
Retiree Health Benefit Fund.
SECTION 3.2.(c) Effective July 1, 2025, the annual employer contributions for the
2025-2027 fiscal biennium, payable monthly, by the State to the North Carolina State Health
Plan for Teachers and State Employees for each covered employee is a maximum of eight
thousand five hundred dollars ($8,500).
SECTION 3.2.(d) G.S. 135-151(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Funding of the QEBA. – The QEBA shall be unfunded within the meaning of federal
tax laws. No payee contributions or deferrals, direct or indirect, by election or otherwise shall be
made or allowed. The benefit liability for the QEBA shall be determined each fiscal year, and
assets shall not be accumulated to pay benefits in future fiscal years. All of the following apply
to employer contributions required to pay benefits under the QEBA:
(1) The Board of Trustees, upon the recommendation of the actuary engaged by
the Board of Trustees, shall determine the employer contributions required to
pay the benefits due under the QEBA for each fiscal year.
(2) The required contributions shall be paid by all participating employers.
(3) The required contributions shall be deposited in a separate fund from the fund
into which regular employer contributions are deposited for the Retirement
System. The benefit liability for the QEBA shall be determined each fiscal
year, and assets shall not be accumulated to pay benefits in future fiscal years.
(4) A portion of the employer contribution rate established for retirement benefits
as a percentage of covered salaries for teachers, State employees, and State
law enforcement officers may be deposited into the separate fund established
in accordance with subdivision (3) of this subsection. The amount of the
portion allowable under this subdivision shall not exceed one-hundredths
percent (0.01%) in any given fiscal year."
SECTION 3.2.(e) The State contribution to the North Carolina Firefighters' and
Rescue Squad Workers' Pension Fund is increased by three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium resulting in a total
State contribution of twenty million seven hundred fifty-two thousand two hundred eight dollars
($20,752,208) for each fiscal year.

CONTRIBUTION-RELATED APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 3.3. There is transferred from the General Fund to a Benefits
Contributions Reserve in the Office of State Budget and Management the sum of one hundred
ninety-seven million five hundred sixty-three thousand one hundred thirty-three dollars
($197,563,133) in recurring funds to be distributed accordingly to account for the State
contributions required by this Part and the funds distributed are appropriated for this purpose.

PART IV. MISCELLANEOUS
Page 6 Senate Bill 177-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

DISASTER FUNDING
SECTION 4.1.(a) Lumber River Basin Funding. – The State Controller shall transfer
the sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year of the funds allocated to the Department of Environmental Quality from the State Capital
and Infrastructure Fund as referenced in Section 40.7 of S.L. 2021-180, as amended, to Robeson
County for State matching requirements for federal funding for the community-led Lumber River
Basin Coalition waterway restoration project due to damage from Potential Tropical Cyclone #8
and Tropical Storm Debby.
SECTION 4.1.(b) Reversion. – Remaining unspent funds appropriated under this
section shall revert to the State Capital and Infrastructure Fund to be used for the original purpose
set forth in Section 40.7 of S.L. 2021-180, as amended, if not used to draw down federal funds
before the expiration of the federal deadline to receive those funds.
SECTION 4.2.(a) Statewide Agricultural Disaster Crop Loss Funding. – There is
appropriated from the State Emergency Response and Disaster Relief Fund to the Department of
Agriculture and Consumer Services the sum of one hundred forty-two million dollars
($142,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year for the Agricultural Disaster
Crop Loss Program (Program), established in Section 2D.2(a) of S.L. 2025-2, for verifiable
losses from an agricultural disaster in 2024.
SECTION 4.2.(b) Funding Requirements. – Funds allocated to the Program under
this section shall be subject to all requirements of Section 2D.2 of S.L. 2025-2. The Department
of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall include these funds in the reporting requirements set
forth in Section 2D.2(i) of S.L. 2025-2. Section 2D.2(h) of S.L. 2025-2 does not apply to these
funds.
SECTION 4.3.(a) Receipt of Allocations. – A recipient of State funds under this Part
shall use best efforts and take all reasonable steps to obtain alternative funds that cover the losses
or needs for which the State funds are provided, including funds from insurance policies in effect
and available federal aid. State funds paid under this Part are declared to be excess over funds
received by a recipient from the settlement of a claim for loss or damage covered under the
recipient's applicable insurance policy in effect or federal aid. Where a recipient is an institution
of higher education or a non-State entity, the requirement regarding alternative funds and the
calculation of alternative funds received under this subsection includes seeking private donations
to help cover the losses or needs for which State funds are provided. An agency awarding State
funds for disaster relief shall include a notice to the recipient of the requirements of this
subsection.
SECTION 4.3.(b) Remittance of Funds. – If a recipient obtains alternative funds
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the recipient shall remit the funds to the State agency
from which the State funds were received. A recipient is not required to remit any amount in
excess of the State funds provided to the recipient under this Part. The State agency shall transfer
these funds to the Savings Reserve.
SECTION 4.3.(c) Contract Requirements. – Any contract or other instrument
entered into by a recipient for receipt of funds under this Part shall include the requirements set
forth in subsections (a) and (b) of this section.
SECTION 4.3.(d) Limitation on Powers of Governor. – The Governor may not use
the funds described in this Part to make budget adjustments under G.S. 143C-6-4 or to make
reallocations under G.S. 166A-19.40(c). Nothing in this Part shall be construed to prohibit the
Governor from exercising the Governor's authority under these statutes with respect to funds
other than those described in this Part.
SECTION 4.3.(e) Directive. – The Governor shall ensure that funds allocated in this
Part are expended in a manner that does not adversely affect any person's or entity's eligibility
for federal funds that are made available, or that are anticipated to be made available, as a result
Senate Bill 177-Third Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of natural disasters. The Governor shall also, to the extent practicable, avoid using State funds to
cover costs that will be, or likely will be, covered by federal funds.
SECTION 4.3.(f) Continuation of Allocation Reporting Requirements. – OSBM
shall add the appropriations and allocations provided for in this Part to the reporting requirements
set forth in Section 4.1(g) of S.L. 2025-2.
SECTION 4.3.(g) Continuation of State Auditor Oversight. – The Office of the
Governor of North Carolina shall continue the reporting requirements set forth in Section 4.2 of
S.L. 2025-2 for funds described in this Part. The State Auditor shall include all funds appropriated
and allocated under this Part in their report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental
Operations and include the expenditure of these funds in the public dashboard as set forth in
Sections 4.2(c) and (d) of S.L. 2025-2.
SECTION 4.4. If Senate Bill 401, 2025 Regular Session, becomes law, then Part II
of that act is repealed.

PART V. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5.1. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1,
2025.
Page 8 Senate Bill 177-Third Edition